Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 1. Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures

Cross references. —

As to cities and towns generally, see title 15.

As to county finance generally, see chapter 4 of title 18.

As to the administration of finances of senior citizen service districts, see §

18-15-110

.

As to school finance generally, see chapter 13 of title 21.

Weed and pest board without power to direct tax amount. —

Nothing in ch. 5 of title 11, particularly §

11-5-105

, relating to the powers and duties of the county weed and pest district board, as well as the provisions of this article, specifically invests the board with the power to direct the board of county commissioners as to the amount of the tax necessary to carry out the provisions of chapter 5. State ex rel. Albany County Weed & Pest Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 592 P.2d 1154,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 393

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 579 et seq.

64A C.J.S. Municipal Corporations § 1628 et seq.

§ 16-4-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act”.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-317; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-4-102(a)(xx).

§ 16-4-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“AICPA” means the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants;

“Appropriation” means an allocation of money to be expended for a specific purpose;

“Budget” means a plan of financial operations for a fiscal year or two (2) fiscal years, embodying estimates of all proposed expenditures for given purposes, the proposed means of financing them and what the work or service is to accomplish. “Budget” includes the budget of each fund for which a budget is required by law and the collective budgets for all the funds based upon the functions, activities and projects;

“Budget officer” means any official appointed by the governing body of a municipality and the county clerk in the case of counties;

“Budget year” means the fiscal year or years for which a budget is prepared;

“Current year” means the fiscal year in which a budget is prepared and adopted for the ensuing budget year;

“Department” means a functional unit within a fund which carries on a specific activity, such as a police department within a city general fund, the office of an elected county official or a major program category such as “instruction” in a school district fund;

“Estimated revenue” means the amount of revenues estimated to be received during the budget year in each fund;

“Financial and compliance audit” means the determination in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards:

Whether financial operations are properly conducted;

Whether the financial reports of an audited entity are presented fairly; and

Whether the entity has complied with applicable laws and regulations.

“Fiscal year” means the annual period for recording fiscal operations beginning July 1 and ending June 30;

“Fund balance” means the excess of the assets over liabilities, reserves and contributions, as reflected by a municipality’s books of account;

“Fund deficit” means the excess of liabilities, reserves and contributions over fund assets, as reflected by a municipality’s books of account;

“Independent auditors” means independent public accountants who have no personal interest in the financial affairs of the entity or in affairs of the officers of the entity being audited and who audit under the standards promulgated by the AICPA for state and local governments;

“Municipality” means:

All incorporated first class cities, towns having a population in excess of four thousand (4,000) inhabitants and all towns operating under the city manager form of government;

Counties;

School districts;

Community colleges.

“Proposed budget” means the budget presented for public hearing as required by W.S.

16-4-109

and formatted as required by W.S. 16-4-104(b);

“Requested budget” means a budget presented by the budget officer to the governing body on or before May 15;

“Unanticipated income” means income which is received during the budget year which could not reasonably have been expected to be available during the current budget year;

“Unappropriated surplus” means the portion of the fund balance of a budgetary fund which has not been appropriated or reserved in an ensuing budget year;

“Uniform chart of accounts” means the chart of accounts designed for municipalities which have been approved by the director of the state department of audit;

“This act” means W.S.

16-4-101

through

16-4-125

.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-318; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 152, § 2; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 2001, ch. 194, § 1; ch. 199, § 1; 2015 ch. 131, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “16–4–125” for “16–4–124” in (a)(xx).

Laws 2015, ch. 131, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2015, ch. 131, § 2, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 16-4-103.
Budget requirements.

Municipal budgets are required each fiscal year or every other year as provided for in W.S. 16-4-104(h) for all expenditures and funds of the municipalities.

Intragovernmental and enterprise fund municipal budgets are required for adequate management control and for public information including financial statements of condition, work programs and any other costs as the municipal governing body may request. These fund accounts shall not be deemed to have spent amounts in excess of those budgeted when the funds available from all sources are sufficient to cover the additional operating expenditures which have been approved by the governing bodies.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 7, § 1.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-319; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1995, ch. 92, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2000, ch. 7, § 1; 2001, ch. 194, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “sources are sufficient” for “sources is sufficient.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 16-4-104.
Preparation of budgets; contents; review; subsequent authorized projects.

All departments shall submit budget requests to the appropriate budget officer on or before May 1, except as provided for in subsection (h) of this section. On or before May 15, the budget officer shall prepare a requested budget for each fund and file the requested budget with the governing body, except as provided for in subsection (h) of this section. The requested budget shall be prepared to best serve the municipality and county budget officers shall include all departmental requests. The governing body may amend the requested budget and the requested budget as amended shall be the budget proposed for adoption.

The appropriate budget officer shall prepare a proposed budget for each fund and file the proposed budget with the governing body in a timely fashion allowing the governing body to meet the hearing date and notice requirements established by W.S.

16-4-109

. The format of the proposed budget shall be prepared to best serve the municipality except that the budget formats for community colleges shall be uniform and approved by the community college commission and the director of the state department of audit. The proposed budget shall set forth:

Actual revenues and expenditures in the last completed budget year;

Estimated total revenues and expenditures for the current budget year;

The estimated available revenues and expenditures for the ensuing budget year.

Each proposed and adopted budget shall contain the estimates of expenditures and revenues developed by the budget officer together with specific work programs and other supportive data as the governing body requests. The estimates of revenues shall contain estimates of all anticipated revenues from any source whatsoever including any revenues from state distribution of taxes including sales and use tax including any local optional sales and use tax, lodging tax, fuel tax, cigarette tax and severance tax, federal mineral royalties from the state, any mineral royalty grants from the state loan and investment board, and any local sources including business permits and building permits. The estimates shall be made according to budget year, including the difference from the previous budget year for each source.

Each proposed and adopted budget shall be accompanied by a budget message in explanation of the budget. The budget message shall contain an outline of the proposed financial policies for the budget year and describe in connection therewith the important features of the budgetary plan. It shall also state the reasons for changes from the previous year in appropriation and revenue items and explain any major changes in financial policy.

The proposed budget shall be reviewed and considered by the governing body in a regular or special meeting called for this purpose. Following a public hearing as provided in W.S.

16-4-109

, the governing body shall adopt a budget.

This act does not prevent the municipality from undertaking any project authorized by vote of the people after adoption of the budget.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 3.

Any incorporated city or town may employ a two (2) year budget cycle and adopt a two (2) year budget under the following conditions:

The two (2) year period shall begin with the city’s or town’s first fiscal year following a budget session of the legislature;

For the second year of the budget cycle, the budget officer shall prepare a budget adjustment that includes the original budget and any proposed changes in revenues and expenditures. The governing body shall consider and adopt the second year budget adjustment according to the same procedure that was used for the original two (2) year budget, including all public notices and hearings;

The city or town shall comply with all other provisions of this act. The requirements of this act may be performed on a biennial basis pursuant to this subsection unless this act specifies that the requirement be performed on a fiscal year or annual basis and the provision in which the requirement appears does not reference this subsection. Any other provision of law imposing reporting or other requirements upon a city or town on an annual or fiscal year basis shall not be affected by the adoption of a biennial year budget pursuant to this subsection unless the provision in which the requirement appears references this subsection.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-320; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 152, § 2; ch. 208, § 2; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1995, ch. 92, § 1; 2000, ch. 7, § 1; 2001, ch. 194, §§ 2, 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 56, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 2; 2009, ch. 90, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to duties of the community college commission in general, see §

21-18-202

.

The 2008 amendment,

repealed former (j), pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed (g).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law. The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts. Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-4-102(a)(xx).

Cited

in

Veile v. Board of County Comm'rs, 860 P.2d 1174,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 16-4-105.
Accumulated retained earnings or fund surplus; capital improvements reserve.

A municipality may accumulate retained earnings in any enterprise or intragovernmental service fund or accumulate a fund surplus in any other fund. With respect to the general fund the accumulated fund balance may be used to meet any legal obligation of the municipality or to:

Provide cash to finance expenditures from the beginning of the budget year until general property taxes and other revenues are collected;

Provide a reserve to meet emergency expenditures; or

Provide a reserve by the carryover from one (1) biennium to another of any surplus generated by community service and continuing education programs operated by community colleges.

A municipality may appropriate funds from estimated revenue in any budget year to a reserve for capital improvements and for depreciation within any capital improvements fund, and for the purpose of purchasing or replacing specified equipment or a depreciation reserve for equipment, which has been duly established by ordinance. Money in the reserves may be allowed to accumulate from year to year until the accumulated total is sufficient to permit economical expenditure for the specified purposes. Disbursements from reserves shall be made only by transfer to a revenue account within a capital improvements fund pursuant to an appropriation for the fund. The amount appropriated to reserves under this subsection in any budget year shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the municipality’s total revenues for that budget year.

Expenditures from capital improvement or equipment budget accounts shall conform to all requirements of this act as it relates to the execution and control of budgets.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-321; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1986, ch. 12, § 1; 1991, ch. 59, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-4-102(a)(xx).

Provision was made in the Municipal Budget Act (now repealed) for unanticipated expenditures.

Wyoming State Treasurer v. Casper, 551 P.2d 687,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1976).

§ 16-4-106.
Property tax levy.

The amount of estimated revenue from property tax required by the budget shall constitute the basis for determination of the property tax to be levied for the corresponding tax years subject to legal limitations. The amount of tax shrinkage allowed shall not exceed the actual percentage of uncollected taxes to the total taxes levied for the preceding fiscal year or preceding two (2) fiscal years pursuant to W.S. 16-4-104(h). This section also applies to entities described in W.S. 16-4-125(c).

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-322; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2001, ch. 194, § 1; ch. 199, § 1; 2009, ch. 90, § 2, ch. 169, § 1; 2017 ch. 62, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “16-4-125(c)” for “16-4-104(f)” in the last sentence.

The section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, deleted “districts and” following “also applies to.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law. The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts. Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

Laws 2009, ch. 169, § 1, provides: “Except as provided in sections 3 and 4 of this act, any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes church, religious society, or institution exempt from property tax under state constitutional or statutory provisions, 28 ALR4th 344.

§ 16-4-107.
Authorized purchases or encumbrances.

All purchases or all encumbrances on behalf of any municipality shall be made or incurred only upon an order or approval of the person duly authorized to make such purchases except encumbrances or expenditures directly investigated and reported and approved by the governing body.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-323; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-4-108.
Limitation on expenditures or encumbrances; documentation of expenditures.

No officer or employee of a municipality shall make any expenditure or encumbrance in excess of the total appropriation for any department. The budget officer shall report to the governing body any expenditure or encumbrance made in violation of this subsection.

The expenditure of municipality monies, other than employee contract payments, may be authorized by the governing body when the payee has provided the municipality with an invoice or other document identifying the quantity and total cost per item or for the services rendered included on the invoice or other document and the claim is certified under penalty of perjury by the vendor or by an authorized person employed by the municipality receiving the items or for whom the services were rendered.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-324; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 137, § 1; 2001, ch. 199, § 1.

§ 16-4-109.
Budget hearings.

A summary of the proposed budget shall be entered into the minutes and the governing body shall publish the summary at least one (1) week before the hearing date in a newspaper having general circulation in which the municipality is located, if there is one, otherwise by posting the notice in three (3) conspicuous places within the municipality.

Hearings for county budgets shall be held not later than the third Monday in July, for city and town budgets not later than the third Tuesday in June, for school districts and community college districts not later than the third Wednesday in July. The governing board of each municipality shall arrange for and hold the hearings and provide accommodations for interested persons. Copies of publications of hearings shall be furnished to the director of the state department of audit and school districts shall also furnish copies to the state department of education. This section also applies to entities described in W.S. 16-4-125(c) excluding incorporated towns not subject to this act.

and (d) Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 7, § 1.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-325; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 152, § 2; 1991, ch. 21, § 1; ch. 240, § 1; 1995, ch. 92, § 1; 2000, ch. 7, § 1; ch. 9, § 1; 2001, ch. 199, § 1; 2009, ch. 90, § 2; 2012, ch. 79, § 1; 2017 ch. 62, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to meetings of governmental agencies generally, see art. 4 of this chapter.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (b) substituted “16-4-125(c)” for “16-4-104(g)” in the last sentence.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (b), deleted “nor prior to the second Monday in July” following “Monday in July” and “prior to the second Tuesday in June nor” following “town budgets not” in the first sentence, inserted “not later than,” and substituted “not later than five (5) days after” for “within five (5) days of” also in the first sentence.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (b), deleted “and for all other special purpose districts having the power to levy or require the levy of taxes not later than five (5) days after the third Thursday in July except as hereafter provided. The governing board of any special purpose district may choose to hold the budget hearing in conjunction with the county budget hearings and so advertise” at the end of the first sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law. The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts. Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-4-102(a)(xx).

§ 16-4-110.
Limitation on appropriations.

The governing body of a municipality shall not make any appropriation in the final budget of any fund in excess of the estimated expendable revenue of the fund for the budget year.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-326; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-4-111.
Adoption of budget.

Within twenty-four (24) hours of the conclusion of the public hearing under W.S. 16-4-109(b), the governing body of each municipality shall, by resolution or ordinance, make the necessary appropriations and adopt the budget, which, subject to future amendment, shall be in effect for the next fiscal year or two (2) fiscal years pursuant to W.S. 16-4-104(h).

Prior to adopting the budget, the county commissioners may veto, in whole or in part, line items of budgets presented by boards which were totally appointed by the county commissioners.

Boards, the members of which are appointed by the county commissioners, shall expend funds only as authorized by the approved budget unless a departure from the budget is authorized by the board of county commissioners.

As provided by W.S. 39-13-104(k), a copy of the adopted budget, certified by the budget officer, shall be furnished the county commissioners for the necessary property tax levies. Certified copies of the adopted budget shall be on file in the office of the budget officer for public inspection. Copies of school district budgets shall be furnished to the state department of education and copies of community college budgets shall be furnished to the community college commission. This section also applies to entities described in W.S. 16-4-125(c) excluding incorporated cities and towns under four thousand (4,000) inhabitants.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-327; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 208, § 2; 1989, ch. 105, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2000, ch. 9, § 1; 2001, ch. 194, § 1; ch. 199, § 1; 2009, ch. 90, § 2; 2017 ch. 62, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (d) substituted “16-4-125(c)” for “16-4-104(g)” in the last sentence.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (d), deleted “districts and” following “also applies to.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law. The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts. Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

§ 16-4-112.
Transfer of unencumbered or unexpended appropriation balances.

At the request of the budget officer or upon its own motion after publication of notice, the governing body may by resolution transfer any unencumbered or unexpended appropriation balance or part thereof from one (1) fund, department or account to another.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-328; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-4-113.
General fund budget increase.

The budget of the general fund may be increased by resolution of the governing body. The source of the revenue shall be shown whether unanticipated, unappropriated surplus, donations, etc.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-329; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-4-114.
Emergency expenditures.

If the governing body determines an emergency exists and the expenditure of money in excess of the general fund budget is necessary, it may make the expenditures from revenues available under W.S. 16-4-105(a)(ii) as reasonably necessary to meet the emergency. Notice of the declaration of emergency shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-330; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Provision was made in the Municipal Budget Act (now repealed) for unanticipated expenditures.

Wyoming State Treasurer v. Casper, 551 P.2d 687,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1976).

§ 16-4-115.
Appropriations lapse; prior claims.

All appropriations excluding appropriations for capital projects shall lapse following the close of the budget year to the extent they are not expended or encumbered. All claims incurred prior to the close of any fiscal year shall be treated as if properly encumbered.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-331; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-4-116.
Transfer of special fund balances.

If the necessity to maintain any special revenue or assessment fund ceases and there is a balance in the fund, the governing body shall authorize the transfer of the balance to the fund balance account in the general fund. Any balance which remains in a capital improvements or capital projects fund shall be transferred to the appropriate debt service fund or other fund as the bond ordinance requires or to the general fund balance account.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-332; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-4-117.
Interfund loans.

The governing body may authorize interfund loans from one (1) fund to another at interest rates and terms for repayment as it may prescribe and may invest available cash in any fund as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-333; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-4-118.
Special assessments.

Money received by the municipal treasurer from any special assessment shall be applied towards payment of the improvement for which the assessment was approved. The money shall be used exclusively for the payment of the principal and interest on the bonds or other indebtedness incurred to finance the improvements except as provided in W.S.

16-4-116

.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-334; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-4-119.
Financial statements and reports; public inspection.

The budget officer shall present to the governing body the statement and reports provided by subsection (b) of this section.

Appropriate interim financial statements and reports of financial position, operating results and other pertinent information may be prepared to facilitate management control of financial operations and, where necessary or desired, for external reporting purposes as required by the governing body.

All financial statements made pursuant to this section shall be open for public inspection during regular business hours.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-335; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-4-120.
Prescribed accounting systems.

Each municipality shall maintain their accounting records in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

Each school district and community college shall continue to maintain the uniform system of accounting prescribed by the state department of education and the community college commission.

Each county and special district hospital shall continue to maintain the uniform system of accounting in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and federal hospital regulations.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-337; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Applied

in

Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 16-4-121.
Required annual audits; conduct; expenses; commencement and completion; additional requirements for school audits.

The governing body of each municipality shall cause to be made an annual audit of the financial affairs and transactions of all funds and activities of the municipality for each fiscal year. At the option of the governing body, audits may be made at more frequent intervals.

The governing body shall make available all documents and records required to perform the audit upon request by the independent auditor.

The audits shall be conducted by independent auditors in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards as promulgated by the AICPA in their guidelines for audits of state and local government units. The audit procedures shall be performed in accordance with “Government Auditing Standards”, issued by the comptroller general of the United States. Any audit performed shall comply with the requirements of W.S.

9-1-507

.

The expenses of audits required by this act shall be paid by the municipality for which the audit is made.

The first audit shall commence with the fiscal year ending June 30, 1982 and thereafter at the end of each fiscal year. Except for school audits which shall be completed by November 15 following the end of the audited fiscal year, the audits shall be completed not more than six (6) months after the end of the fiscal year being audited. If within seven (7) months after the end of the fiscal year, a copy of an audit report has not been received by the director of the state department of audit, inquiry shall be made by the director. If the municipality has failed to have an annual audit commenced, the director shall make written demand on the governing body to commence the annual audit within thirty (30) days. If the annual audit report of a municipality is not filed with the director within nine (9) months after the end of the fiscal year, the director shall contract with an independent auditor to conduct the audit and shall reimburse the independent auditor from sufficient state revenues and grants withheld from the municipality when certified by the director to the state treasurer, to pay the expenses of the audit. If there are no state funds which may be withheld, the director shall require the municipality to pay the audit expenses from any funds available and certify the amount to be collected to the attorney general for appropriate legal proceedings.

County memorial hospitals and hospital districts shall have an annual audit conducted by an independent certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards applicable to the district or entity. The audit expense shall be included in the operating budget of the district or entity.

Each year an audit shall be made in accordance with the requirements of subsection (c) of this section and a report filed for the immediately succeeding fiscal year as necessary to determine foundation program guarantees and account expenditures by school districts.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-338; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1988, ch. 82, § 1; 1989, ch. 157, § 1, ch. 260, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1995, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2001, ch. 199, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 26, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-4-102(a)(xx).

Applied

in

Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 16-4-122.
Required annual audits; reports; contents and filing.

Audit reports shall conform to generally accepted accounting principles as provided by W.S. 16-4-121(c).

Copies of the audit reports shall be filed with and preserved by the county clerk of each affected county and shall be open to inspection by any interested person. Copies of all audits shall also be filed with the director of the state department of audit. Copies of school audits shall also be filed with the state department of education on or before December 15 following the end of the audited fiscal year. Copies of community college audit findings shall also be filed with the community college commission and the state budget department as provided by W.S.

21-18-204

.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-339; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1988, ch. 82, § 1; 1989, ch. 260, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1995, ch. 199, § 1; 2000, ch. 73, § 1; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to establishment of state department of education, see §

21-2-104

. As to creation of community college commission, see §

21-18-201

.

The 2021 amendment,

in the last sentence of (b), added "state" preceding "budget," deleted "division of the" preceding "department" and "of administration and information" preceding "as provided."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Applied

in

Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 16-4-123.
Examinations of audit reports; violations; malfeasance by public officers and employees.

The director of the state department of audit shall monitor and may examine each audit to determine if the audit is in compliance with this act. The director shall have access to the working papers of the auditor. If the director determines an audit is not in compliance with this act, he shall notify the governing body of the municipality and the auditor submitting the audit report and in the case of a school district audit, the state department of education, by submitting to them a statement of deficiencies. If the deficiencies are not corrected within ninety (90) days from the date of the statement of deficiencies or within twelve (12) months after the end of the fiscal year of the municipality, whichever is later, the director shall proceed in the same manner as if no report had been filed.

If the director of the state department of audit, in examining any audit report, finds an indication of violation of state law, he shall, after making an investigation as deemed necessary, consult with the attorney general, and if after investigation and consultation there is reason to believe there has been a violation of state law on the part of any person, the facts shall be certified to the attorney general who shall cause appropriate proceedings to be brought.

If it appears an auditor has knowingly issued an audit report under the provisions of this act containing any false or misleading statement, the director of the state department of audit shall report the matter in writing to the Wyoming board of certified public accountants and to the municipality.

Any member of the governing body or any member, officer, employee or agent of any department, board, commission or other agency who knowingly and willfully fails to perform any of the duties imposed upon him by this act, or who knowingly and willfully violates any of the provisions of this act, or who knowingly and willfully furnishes to the auditor or his employee any false or fraudulent information is guilty of malfeasance and, upon conviction thereof, the court shall enter judgment to remove the person from office or employment. It is the duty of the court rendering the judgment to cause immediate notice of removal from office or employment to be given to the proper officer of the municipality so the vacancy thus caused may be filled.

The director of the state department of audit shall report willful violations of this act by any municipal officer to the attorney general for appropriate criminal and civil proceedings. The county or district attorney shall furnish assistance to the attorney general when requested.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-340; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 260, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1995, ch. 199, § 1; 1996, ch. 51, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (c), substituted “Wyoming board of certified public accountants” for “state board of accountancy.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 16-4-102(a)(xx).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”